Utah statutes.
32A-1-102 (Repealed 07/01/11).   Application of title -- Severability.
(1)  This title governs alcoholic beverage control in this state except where
a local authority is expressly granted regulatory control by this title.
(2)  Nothing in this title precludes a local authority from regulating the
sale, storage, service, or consumption of alcoholic beverages if that
regulation does not conflict with this title.
(3)  If any provision of this title or the application of any provision to any
person or circumstance is held invalid, the remainder of this title shall be
given effect without the invalid provision or application.  The provisions of
this title are severable.
